Minnesota, session 2025-2026, HF1933.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 290.0682, subdivision 2, is amended to read: Subd. 2. Credit allowed. (a) An eligible individual is allowed a credit against the tax due under this chapter. (b) The credit for an eligible individual equals the least of: (1) eligible loan payments minus ten percent of an amount equal to adjusted gross income in excess of $10,000, but in no case less than zero; (2) the earned income for the taxable year of the eligible individual, if any; (3) the sum of: (i) the interest portion of eligible loan payments made during the taxable year; and (ii) ten percent of the original loan amount of all qualified education loans of the eligible individual; or (4) deleted text begin $500deleted text end new text begin $1,000new text end . (c) For a part-year resident, the credit must be allocated based on the percentage calculated under section 290.06, subdivision 2c, paragraph (e). (d) In the case of a married couple, each spouse is eligible for the credit in this section. For the purposes of paragraph (b), for married taxpayers filing joint returns, each spouse's adjusted gross income equals the spouse's percentage share of the couple's earned income, multiplied by the couple's combined adjusted gross income. new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective for taxable years beginning after December 31, 2024. new text end Sec. 2. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 290.0682, is amended by adding a subdivision to read: new text begin Subd. 3. new text end new text begin Credit refundable; appropriation. new text end new text begin If the amount of credit that the claimant is eligible to receive under this section exceeds the claimant's tax liability under this chapter, the commissioner shall refund the excess to the claimant. An amount sufficient to pay the refunds required by this section is appropriated to the commissioner from the general fund. new text end new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective for taxable years beginning after December 31, 2024. new text end